Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-194.04
Sale of confections or candy; license requirements; label.

No person, firm, or corporation shall sell or offer for sale any confections or candy that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol rendered unfit for beverage purposes unless licensed under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Any confections or candy sold in this state that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol rendered unfit for beverage purposes shall bear a label containing the following statement: Sale of this product to persons under the legal age for purchasing alcoholic liquor is unlawful.

Laws 1988, LB 901, § 4.